test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-amas_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjektiv - amas: # 
    amas+A+Attr: amas

    amas+A+Sg+Nom: amas
    amas+A+Pl+Nom: abmasa

#    amas+A+Sg+Gen: abmasa
#    amas+A+Sg+Acc: abmasav
#    amas+A+Sg+Ill: abmasij
#    amas+A+Sg+Ine: abmasin
#    amas+A+Sg+Ela: [abmasist, abmasis]
#    amas+A+Sg+Com: abmasijn
#    amas+A+Pl+Gen: abmasij
#    amas+A+Pl+Acc: abmasijd
#    amas+A+Pl+Ill: abmasijda
#    amas+A+Pl+Ine: abmasijn
#    amas+A+Pl+Ela: [abmasijst, abmasijs]
#    amas+A+Pl+Com: [abmasij, abmasijgum]
##    amas+A+Ess: abmasan

    amas+A+Comp+Attr: abmasup

    amas+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: abmasup
    amas+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: [abmasubo, abmasuba]

#    amas+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: abmasubo
#    amas+A+Comp+Sg+Acc: abmasubov
#    amas+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: abmasuboj
#    amas+A+Comp+Sg+Ine: abmasubon
#    amas+A+Comp+Sg+Ela: [abmasubost, abmasubos]
#    amas+A+Comp+Sg+Com: [abmasubojn, abmasubojna]
#    amas+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: abmasuboj
#    amas+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: abmasubojd
#    amas+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: abmasubojda
#    amas+A+Comp+Pl+Ine: abmasubojn
#    amas+A+Comp+Pl+Ela: [abmasubojst, abmasubojs]
#    amas+A+Comp+Pl+Com: [abmasuboj, abmasubojgum]
##    amas+A+Comp+Ess: abmasubon

    amas+A+Superl+Attr: abmasumos

    amas+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: abmasumos
    amas+A+Superl+Pl+Nom: abmasubmusa

#    amas+A+Superl+Sg+Gen: abmasubmusa
#    amas+A+Superl+Sg+Acc: abmasubmusav
#    amas+A+Superl+Sg+Ill: abmasubmusij
#    amas+A+Superl+Sg+Ine: abmasubmusin
#    amas+A+Superl+Sg+Ela: [abmasubmusist, abmasubmusis]
#    amas+A+Superl+Sg+Com: abmasubmusijn
#    amas+A+Superl+Pl+Gen: abmasubmusij
#    amas+A+Superl+Pl+Acc: abmasubmusijd
#    amas+A+Superl+Pl+Ill: abmasubmusijda
#    amas+A+Superl+Pl+Ine: abmasubmusijn
#    amas+A+Superl+Pl+Ela: [abmasubmusijst, abmasubmusijs]
#    amas+A+Superl+Pl+Com: [abmasubmusij, abmasubmusijgum]
##    amas+A+Superl+Ess: abmasubmusan
